apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="/anîn__vblex_tv">
<!-- add infinitives -->
		<e><p><l>anîn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>anî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>anî<b/>bû</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>anî<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>anî<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>anî<b/>bûn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>anî<b/>bûyî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>anî<b/>bûm</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>tînim</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>tînî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>tîne</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>tînin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>tînin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>tînin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>bînim</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>bînî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>bîne</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>bînin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>bînin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>bînin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>naynim</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>naynî</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>nayne</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>naynin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>naynin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
		<e><p><l>naynin</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Adverbs -->
    
    <pardef n="niha__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ne__adv">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="adv"/><s n="neg"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Interjections -->
    
    <pardef n="merheba__ij">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="ij"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


  </pardefs>

    <e lm="merheba"><i>merheba</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="silav"><i>silav</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="sipas"><i>sipas</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="rojbaş"><i>rojbaş</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="serçavan"><i>serçavan</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bibore"><i>bibore</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bibaxişîne"><i>bibaxişîne</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="dembaş"><i>dembaş</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="rojbaş"><i>rojbaş</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="êvarbaş"><i>êvarbaş</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="oxir be"><i>oxir<b/>be</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="bi xatirê te"><i>bi<b/>xatirê<b/>te</i><par n="merheba__ij"/></e>
    <e lm="hergav"><i>hergav</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nexwe"><i>nexwe</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bitenê"><i>bitenê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tavilê"><i>tavilê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="yekpare"><i>yekpare</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="berjêr"><i>berjêr</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="misoger"><i>misoger</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rûber"><i>rûber</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dirêjkî"><i>dirêjkî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="met"><i>met</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="piçek"><i>piçek</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tavil"><i>tavil</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="binpê"><i>binpê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="evqas"><i>evqas</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gişk"><i>gişk</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="birastî"><i>birastî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dûvre"><i>dûvre</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="qaşo"><i>qaşo</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mirovane"><i>mirovane</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="xasma"><i>xasma</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kêmzêde"><i>kêmzêde</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paşve"><i>paşve</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hevra"><i>hevra</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dubare"><i>dubare</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tevde"><i>tevde</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bihevra"><i>bihevra</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="geh"><i>geh</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lewma"><i>lewma</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="qe"><i>qe</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bilez"><i>bilez</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="cardin"><i>cardin</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="jixwe"><i>jixwe</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="yekser"><i>yekser</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lewre"><i>lewre</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hew"><i>hew</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pitir"><i>pitir</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nemaze"><i>nemaze</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hîç"><i>hîç</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="îcar"><i>îcar</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="carna"><i>carna</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dibit"><i>dibit</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nuha"><i>nuha</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="helbet"><i>helbet</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hingî"><i>hingî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ewqas"><i>ewqas</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bidest"><i>bidest</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bicih"><i>bicih</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hêj"><i>hêj</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paş"><i>paş</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bikar"><i>bikar</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="têde"><i>têde</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hertim"><i>hertim</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bes"><i>bes</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="rasterast"><i>rasterast</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zehf"><i>zehf</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="berçav"><i>berçav</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="carina"><i>carina</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hertimî"><i>hertimî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="şunda"><i>şunda</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hevdû"><i>hevdû</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hema"><i>hema</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="na"><i>na</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="belê"><i>belê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hemî"><i>hemî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="çima"><i>çima</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="herdem"><i>herdem</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="belkî"><i>belkî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşve"><i>pêşve</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="zikmakî"><i>zikmakî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="îroyîn"><i>îroyîn</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="herweha"><i>herweha</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="seranser"><i>seranser</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="carnan"><i>carnan</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="gellek"><i>gellek</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="îroj"><i>îroj</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="heta"><i>heta</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bêguman"><i>bêguman</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="lêbelê"><i>lêbelê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bêhtir"><i>bêhtir</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="tev"><i>tev</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="çawa"><i>çawa</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="herwiha"><i>herwiha</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="herwisa"><i>herwisa</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wilo"><i>wilo</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wisa"><i>wisa</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wisa"><p><l>wusa</l><r>wisa</r></p><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wir"><i>wir</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="nêzî"><i>nêzî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hê"><i>hê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="çend"><i>çend</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêş"><i>pêş</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="heman"><i>heman</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="îro"><i>îro</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="vêga"><i>vêga</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêk"><i>pêk</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="her"><i>her</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wiha"><i>wiha</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hemû"><i>hemû</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="herî"><i>herî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="niha"><i>niha</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="niha"><p><l>niho</l><r>niha</r></p><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="walê"><i>walê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ne"><i>ne</i><par n="ne__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paşî"><i>paşî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="piştre"><i>piştre</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dûre"><i>dûre</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="berê"><i>berê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="berî"><i>berî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="duhî"><i>duhî</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="îro"><i>îro</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ewro"><i>ewro</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="par"><i>par</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hingê"><i>hingê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="wer"><i>wer</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="hindek caran"><i>hindek<b/>caran</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="kêm caran"><i>kêm<b/>caran</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="mixabin"><i>mixabin</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dîsan"><i>dîsan</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="paşê"><i>paşê</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="dû re"><i>dû<b/>re</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="bila"><i>bila</i><par n="niha__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="anîn"><p><l></l><r>anîn</r></p><par n="/anîn__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="anîn" r="LR"><p><l>hanîn</l><r>anîn</r></p><par n="/anîn__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="bikaranîn"><p><l>bikar</l><r>bikaranîn</r></p><par n="/anîn__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="bikaranîn" r="LR"><p><l>bi<b/>kar</l><r>bikaranîn</r></p><par n="/anîn__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="bikaranîn" r="LR"><p><l>bi<b/>kar<b/></l><r>bikaranîn</r></p><par n="/anîn__vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="bikaranîn" r="LR"><p><l>bikar<b/></l><r>bikaranîn</r></p><par n="/anîn__vblex_tv"/></e>
